src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n_32_aes
+N         : x_32_aes ;

LEXICON x_32_aes
  +Sg+Nom:ä^WG%>s      K                 ;
  +Sg      :ä^WG%>s      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :hää          ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        ess_nA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        sgpl_cases_even   ;
    !    +Pl+Ill:h%>äissiin   K                 ;

  +Pl      :h%>ää        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>je       gen_n             ; ! sinnikkhäjen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>j        par_A             ; ! sinnikkhäjä
  +Pl      :h%>äi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     ess_nA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ää%>i2    ess_nA            ; ! TODO choose one
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

LEXICON n_32_ae !!= @CODE@ kevät
+N         : x_32_ae ;

LEXICON x_32_ae
  +Sg+Nom  :ä^WG%>t      K                 ;
  +Sg+Nom  :ä^WG         K                 ;
  +Sg      :ä^WG%>t      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :hää          ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        ess_nA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl      :h%>ää        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>äi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     ess_nA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33ys !!= @CODE@ rakas
!        +N:        vanha_x_33ys ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%>y^WGs R      ;



LEXICON n_32_is !!= @CODE@ ruvis, ruumis
+N+Dial/Por:^Por x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Var:^Var x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok x_32_is ;

LEXICON x_32_is ! kaunis
  +Sg      :i^WG%>s   nom_end         ;
  +Sg      :hii       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :i^WG%>s   par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :%>hii     ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :hii       ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :hii       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl      :hii       nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :hii       gen_tten        ; ! rukkhiitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hi%>je    gen_n           ; ! rukhijen
  +Pl      :hii       par_tA          ; ! rukkhiita
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hi%>j     par_A           ; ! rukhija
  +Pl      :hii       ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>hii     ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :h%>i2i    com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ii     sgpl_cases_even ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33  !!= @CODE@ odottaessa viitataan n_33t-hen
!  n_33t ;

LEXICON n_32_et !!= @CODE@ venet, hyljet, huonet
+N         :   x_32_et ;

LEXICON x_32_et
  +Sg+Dial/Var+Nom:e^WG     K              ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:e^WG        nom_t          ;
  +Sg      :e^WG%>t     par_tA         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! venhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ; ! venhejä
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common ;

LEXICON n_32_et_pl !!= @CODE@ venet, hyljet, huonet
+N         :   x_32_et_pl ;

LEXICON x_32_et_pl
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! venhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ; ! venhejä
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common_pl ;

LEXICON n_32_et_2 !!= @CODE@ askel, kyynel, kannel
+N         :   x_32_et2 ;

LEXICON x_32_et2
  +Sg+Dial/Var+Nom:e^WG     K              ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:e^WG        nom_t          ;
  +Sg+Nom  :^WG             K              ; ! askel
  +Sg      :e^WG%>t        par_tA         ; ! askeletta
  +Sg      :^WG^E0         par_tA         ; ! askelta

  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ;
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common ;

LEXICON n_32_ut !!= @CODE@ vantut:vantutta:vantthuut
+N         :   x_32_ut ;

LEXICON x_32_ut
  +Sg+Dial/Var+Nom:u^WG     K              ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:u^WG        nom_t          ;
  +Sg      :u^WG%>t     par_tA         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Var:hu%>je      gen_n          ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hu%>j       par_A          ;

           :thuu         x_32_et_ts_common ;

LEXICON n_32_ut_pl !!= @CODE@ vantthuut
+N         :   x_32_ut_pl ;

LEXICON x_32_ut_pl
  +Sg+Dial/Var+Nom:u^WG     K              ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:u^WG        nom_t          ;
  +Sg      :u^WG%>t     par_tA         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Var:hu%>je      gen_n          ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hu%>j       par_A          ;

           :thuu         x_32_et_ts_common_pl ;

LEXICON n_32_ts !!= @CODE@ kirves
+N         :   x_32_ts ;
+N+Sg      :es nom_R      ;

LEXICON x_32_ts !!= @CODE@ kirves
  +Sg:es          nom_end              ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! Kirvhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:he%>j       par_A          ; ! Kirvhejä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! Kirvhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ; ! Kirvhejä
  +Sg      :es          par_tA         ;
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common ;
             !      +Pl+Gen:hee%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! Can this be commented out? yes, is in the common

LEXICON x_32_et_ts_common
  +Sg      :         gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :         ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :         sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :         nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
      ! +Pl+Ill:heissiin K               ;

LEXICON x_32_et_ts_common_pl
  +Pl      :         nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
      ! +Pl+Ill:heissiin K               ;


LEXICON n_22_excns !!= * @CODE@ = veres (keskus)
+N         :           x_22_excns     ;
+N+Sg      :s          nom_R          ;
!+N+Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;

LEXICON x_22_excns
  +Sg      :^WG%>s     nom_end        ;
  +Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :%>s        par_tA         ;
  +Sg      :ks         ill_heen       ;
!  +Sg      :ks         ill_hVVn       ;
!  +Sg+Ill:ksheen K              ; ! +Pl+Ill:ksh%>i2in K; ! TODO TODO TODO
  +Sg      :kse        ess_nnA        ;
  +Sg      :kse        sgpl_cases_odd ; ! these two lexica for cases with
  +Pl      :kse        nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :%>s        gen_ten        ; ! veresten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! vereksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! vereksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2     par_V          ; ! vereksii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! vereksiitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! vereksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! vereksiä
  +Pl      :ks         ill_hiin       ; ! ei ^HMETA? tai edel tai mitään?
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:kse%>i2    com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:kse%>i2    com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:kse%>i2    com_ne         ;
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    sgpl_cases_odd ; ! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
 ! +Pl+Par:%>ksii     K              ;
 
 !LEXICON vanha_s_kse
! +N:^WG # ;
LEXICON n_22_excns_pl !!= * @CODE@ = veljekset
+N         :           x_22_excns_pl          ;
