src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
hyvet:hyv n_32_et ;
norjalaistamisohjet:norjalaistamis#ohj n_32_et ;
piiret:piirt n_32_et ;
eksemppelivantut:eksemppeli#vant2 n_32_ut ;
puulvantut:puul#vant2 n_32_ut ;
vantut:vant2 n_32_ut ;
villavantthuut:villa#vant2 n_32_ut_pl ;
kattet:katt2 n_32_et ;
taittheet:taitt n_32_et_pl ;
jatkopuhheet:jatko#puh n_32_et_pl ;
palkheet:palk n_32_et_pl ;
ensisyntynheet:ensisyntyn n_32_et_pl ;
matonkutheet:maton#kut n_32_et_pl ;
merkkivaattheet:merkki#vaatt n_32_et_pl ;
ulkovaattheet:ulko#vaatt n_32_et_pl ;
veljekset:velje n_22_excns_pl ;
vares:vare n_22_excns ;
hypet:hypp n_32_et ;
koleraapis:koleraap2i n_22_excns ;
krannikset:kranni n_22_excns_pl ;
jänes:jäne n_22_excns ;
penis:peni n_22_excns ;
turkis:turki n_22_excns ;
kouluhaastet:koulu#haast n_32_et ;
paljet:palj n_32_et ;
pellaamavehjet:pellaama#vehk n_32_et ;
vehjet:vehk n_32_et ;
linnunpöläket:linnun#pöläkk n_32_et ;
kivihyljet:kivi#hylk n_32_et ;
ruvis:ruk n_32_is ;
huonetsammalet:huonet#sammal n_32_et ;
välikappalet:väli#kappal n_32_et ;
sävelet:sävel n_32_et ;
kahlet:kahl n_32_et ;
keläs:kel n_32_aes ;
pängäs:pänk n_32_aes ;
köngäs:könk n_32_aes ;
porrasaskelet:porras#askel n_32_et_2 ;
trappuaskelet:trappu#askel n_32_et_2 ;
askelet:askel n_32_et_2 ;
kyynelet:kyynel n_32_et_2 ;
kantelet:kantel n_32_et_2 ;
perinet:perint n_32_et_2 ;
kapinet:kapin n_32_et ;
perintökapinheet:perintö#kapin n_32_et_pl ;
hihtamavehkheet:hihtama#vehk n_32_et_pl ;
lumihiutalet:lumi#hiutal n_32_et ;
ihmet:ihm n_32_et ;
kärmet:kärm n_32_et ;
nauris:naur n_32_is ;
saalis:saal n_32_is ;
ruumis:ruum n_32_is ;
räämet:rääm n_32_et ;
peilivenet:peili#ven n_32_et ;
muttuurivenet:muttuuri#ven n_32_et ;
seilivenet:seili#ven n_32_et ;
purjetvenet:purjet#ven n_32_et ;
turistivenet:turisti#ven n_32_et ;
juustoainet:juusto#ain n_32_et ;
ravintoainet:ravinto#ain n_32_et ;
ainet:ain n_32_et ;
käänet:käänt n_32_et ;
konet:kon n_32_et ;
kassuuhuonet:kassuu#huon n_32_et ;
kokkoushuonet:kokkous#huon n_32_et ;
pakkahuonet:pakka#huon n_32_et ;
seurahuonet:seura#huon n_32_et ;
kaarnet:kaarn n_32_et ;
eepos:eep2o n_22_excns ;
kiitos:kiit2o n_22_excns ;
aviorikos:avio#rik2o n_22_excns ;
lakimuutos:laki#muuto n_22_excns ;
hiilos:hiilo n_22_excns ;
lumikinos:lumi#kino n_22_excns ;
kuulemiskieros:kuulemis#kiero n_22_excns ;
kaivos:kaivo n_22_excns ;
helvet:help n_32_et ;
kynstikampet:kynsti#kampp n_32_et ;
turvet:turp n_32_et ;
pruukiaset:pruuki#as n_32_et ;
mađet:mat n_32_et ;
rankkasađet:rankka#sat n_32_et ;
sitomasuhđet:sitoma#suht n_32_et ;
rahoituslähđet:rahoitus#läht n_32_et ;
mielipiđet:mieli#pit n_32_et ;
festivaalitunnet:festivaali#tunt n_32_et ;
kaaret:kaart n_32_et ;
aurinkopaistet:aurinko#paist n_32_et ;
listet:list n_32_et ;
roustet:roust n_32_et ;
pyhävaatet:pyhä#vaatt n_32_et ;
viikatet:viikatt n_32_et ; ! XXX check viikatet/vikaatet
otet:ott n_32_et ;
auringonsäđet:auringon#sät n_32_et ;
emeritus:emerit2u n_22_excns ;
tekstikorpus:teksti#korp2u n_22_excns ;
virus:viru n_22_excns ;
bonus:bonu n_22_excns ;
ilmaus:ilmau n_22_excns ;
bachelorkoulaus:bachelor#koulau n_22_excns ;
tulkkikoulaus:tulkki#koulau n_22_excns ;
kuiskaus:kuiskau n_22_excns ;
sinkkisalvaus:sinkki#salvau n_22_excns ;
paiskhaus:paiskhau n_22_excns ;
sisälelokkaus:sisäle#lokkau n_22_excns ;
integreeraus:integreerau n_22_excns ;
tulkkaus:tulkkau n_22_excns ;
taphaus:taphau n_22_excns ;
vatkaus:vatkau n_22_excns ;
ohjaus:ohjau n_22_excns ;
makkaukset:makkau n_22_excns_pl ;
pakkaus:pakkau n_22_excns ;
tinkaus:tinkau n_22_excns ;
päänhuimaus:pään#huimau n_22_excns ;
lainaus:lainau n_22_excns ;
plaanaus:plaanau n_22_excns ;
kothiinkaippaus:kothiin#kaippau n_22_excns ;
luppaus:luppau n_22_excns ;
konsentreeraus:konsentreerau n_22_excns ;
kiussaus:kiussau n_22_excns ;
eđesvastaus:eđes#vastau n_22_excns ;
kaivaus:kaivau n_22_excns ;
takus:tak2u n_22_excns ;
pielus:pielu n_22_excns ;
katekismus:katekismu n_22_excns ;
digitaalikokkous:digitaali#kokkou n_22_excns ;
esirukkous:esirukko n_22_excns ;
lokaalikaasus:lokaali#kaasu n_22_excns ;
vanhus:vanhu n_22_excns ;
kiđukset:kiđu n_22_excns_pl ;
kielitälläykset:kieli#tälläy n_22_excns_pl ;
tervet:terv n_32_et ;
akiles:akil n_32_ts ;
kirves:kirv n_32_ts ;
päälys:pääly n_22_excns ;
läijäys:läijäy n_22_excns ;
motorikulkumääräys:motorikulku#määräy n_22_excns ;
mätäs:mätt n_32_aes ;
seiväs:seip n_32_aes ;
piäs:piä n_22_excns ;
kevät:kev n_32_ae ;
päätös:päät2ö n_22_excns ;
